Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0041.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 108. The portion of highway M-22 in Leelanau County beginning at the intersection of highway M-22 and North Stallman Road and continuing north to the intersection of highway M-22 and North Putnam Road shall be known as the "Company K Indian Veterans 1st Michigan Sharpshooters Civil War Memorial Highway".